Utah statutes.
59-3-104.   Tax equivalent property list -- Assessment of tax equivalent
property.
The county assessor shall keep a separate list of the tax equivalent property
in each tax area in the county, showing the value of all tax equivalent
property in each area.  The value of tax equivalent property established on
the tax equivalent property list is subject to the same process of review and
equalization as the value of taxable property shown in the assessment roll.
The assessment roll delivered to the county treasurer under Section 59-2-326
shall include the tax equivalent property list as equalized.  All tax
equivalent property shall be assessed at its fair market value, as defined
under Section 59-2-102.
